Utah statutes.
57-19-13.   Suspension, revocation, or denial of registration -- Fine.
(1)  Subject to Section 57-19-17, an application for registration of a project
may be denied, an existing registration may be suspended or revoked, or a fine
of not more than $500 may be imposed by the director, if he finds that:
(a)  the developer's advertising or sales techniques or trade practices have
been or are deceptive, false, or misleading;
(b)  the developer has failed to file copies of its advertisements, promotion
literature, or sales contract forms as required by Section 57-19-8;
(c)  the developer has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or
the rules adopted under this chapter that materially affect or would affect
the rights of purchasers or prospective purchasers of an interest in a
project, or that materially affect the administration of this chapter;
(d)  the developer's offering of an interest in a project has worked or would
work a fraud upon purchasers or prospective purchasers of such an interest;
(e)  the developer's application or any amendment to an application is
incomplete in any material respect;
(f)  the developer's application or any amendment to an application contains
material misrepresentations or omissions of material fact which are necessary
to make the statements contained in the application or amendment not
misleading;
(g)  the developer or any officer or director of the developer has been:
(i)  convicted of a felony, or any misdemeanor involving theft, fraud, or
dishonesty;
(ii)  enjoined from, assessed a civil penalty for, or found to have engaged in
the violation of any law designed to protect consumers; or
(iii)  engaged in dishonest practices in any industry involving sales to
consumers;
(h)  the developer has represented or is representing to purchasers in
connection with the offer or sale of an interest in a project that any
accommodations, related facilities, or amenities are planned, without
reasonable grounds to believe that they will be completed within a reasonable
time;
(i)  the developer has disposed of, concealed, or diverted any funds or assets
so as to defeat the rights of purchasers; or
(j)  the developer has failed to provide to purchasers copies of the written
disclosure required by Section 57-19-11.
(2)  The authority to impose fines as provided in this section does not apply
to Subsection (1) (e).
